New York, session 2025-2026, A5462.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "multi-pay- 2 ment yielding equitable rent system (MYERS) act". 3 § 2. The section heading of section 235-g of the real property law, as 4 added by chapter 367 of the laws of 2010, is amended and three new 5 subdivisions 3, 4 and 5 are added to read as follows: 6 [Electronic] Methods of billing and/or payment of rent. 7 3. A landlord shall accept payment of rent by at least one form of 8 payment other than the following: wire transfer, cashier's check, 9 certified check, bank draft, money order, or any form of payment that 10 requires a lessee or tenant to incur a fee as a condition of payment. 11 4. A landlord may demand an exclusive form of payment if the tenant or 12 lessee has previously attempted to pay the landlord or landlord's agent 13 with a check drawn on insufficient funds or the tenant has instructed 14 the drawee to stop payment on a check, draft, or order for the payment 15 of rent to the landlord or landlord's agent. The landlord may demand or 16 require cash as the exclusive form of payment only for a period not 17 exceeding six months following an attempt to pay with a check on insuf- 18 ficient funds or following a tenant's instruction to stop payment. If 19 the landlord chooses to demand or require cash payment under these 20 circumstances, the landlord shall give the tenant a written notice stat- 21 ing that the payment instrument was dishonored and informing the tenant 22 that the tenant shall pay in cash for a period determined by the land- 23 lord, not to exceed six months and shall attach a copy of the dishonored 24 instrument to such notice. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09242-01-5 A. 5462 2 1 5. A landlord shall not require a lessee or tenant to physically 2 tender the payment of rent directly to the landlord unless the landlord 3 provides a location no less than three hundred feet from the building 4 containing or comprising the leased premises at which a lessee or tenant 5 can tender such payment. 6 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 7 have become a law.